Wyoming, session 2025, SF0129.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-2-915 is created to read:

35-2-915. Hospital employee drug and alcohol testing
program; requirements.
SF0129

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0486

(a) As a condition of licensure through the
department, each hospital in the state shall utilize:

(i) A random drug and alcohol testing program
for its employees and potential employees who hold or are
seeking positions requiring safety sensitive duties, the
requirements of which shall be determined by the
department;

(ii) The Wyoming professional assistance program
for employees who test positive for drugs or alcohol as an
alternative to disciplinary action, when doing so is
determined to be the appropriate approach by hospital
administration. If an employee tests positive for drugs or
alcohol and is allowed to utilize the Wyoming professional
assistance program, the employee shall:

(A) Immediately be removed from safety
sensitive duties;

(B) Be evaluated by a qualified substance
abuse counselor;
SF0129

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0486

(C) Complete any counseling or other
treatment recommended by the substance abuse counselor;

(D) Have a negative drug and alcohol test
before returning to any safety sensitive duties;

(E) Following the successful completion of
a treatment program through the Wyoming professional
assistance program for a positive drug or alcohol test, any
subsequent positive drug and alcohol test result
administered to an employee shall be reported to the
department, who shall report the positive drug and alcohol
test to the appropriate licensing board for determination
of the person's further licensure within the state.

(b) The department shall monitor compliance with the
random drug and alcohol testing program through the
department's health care facility licensure and survey
process.

SF0129

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0486
(c) Drugs, for purposes of this section, are defined
as those scheduled controlled substances listed within W.S.
35-1-1014 through 35-7-1022.

(d) Drugs, excluding schedule 1 drugs under W.S.
35-7-1014, consumed as prescribed by a licensed health care
provider are not subject to the requirement of treatment
for a positive drug and alcohol test while the employee is
under the care of a licensed health care provider.

(e) The use of marijuana remains unlawful under
federal and Wyoming law regardless of whether it has been
legalized or decriminalized for medicinal or recreational
purposes in any locality where an employee resides or
visits.

Section 2. W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xxvii) is amended to
read:

35-2-901. Definitions; applicability of provisions.

(a) As used in this act:

SF0129

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0486
(xxvii) "This act" means W.S. 35-2-901 through
35-2-914 35-2-915.

Section 3. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0129